Connecticut, session 2026, SB00501.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 42-339 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established a complex rehabilitation technology and
wheelchair repair advisory council to monitor repairs of wheelchairs,
including complex rehabilitation technology wheelchairs, as defined in
section 42-337, and to make recommendations concerning improving
repair times.
(b) The advisory council shall consist of the following members:
(1) [Two] Three appointed by the House and Senate chairpersons of
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to human services, [one of whom is a
consumer who uses] two of whom are consumers who use a complex
rehabilitation technology wheelchair purchased, leased or repaired
under the Medicaid program, and one of whom is a representative of
the state advocacy system for persons with disabilities, established
pursuant to section 46a-10b;
(2) Two appointed by the House and Senate ranking members of the
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 501
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to human services, one of whom is a consumer who
uses a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair purchased, leased
or repaired under a private health insurance policy, and one of whom is
an authorized wheelchair dealer, as defined in section 42-337;
(3) Two appointed by the House and Senate chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to general law, each of whom is a representative of an
organization that represents persons with physical disabilities;
(4) Two appointed by the House and Senate ranking members of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to general law, [each] one of whom is a consumer who
privately pays for complex rehabilitation technology wheelchairs and
one of whom is an authorized wheelchair dealer, as defined in section
42-337;
(5) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(6) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
(7) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(8) The Healthcare Advocate, or the Healthcare Advocate's designee;
and
(9) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the commissioner's
designee.
(c) Any member of the advisory council appointed under subdivision
(1), (2), (3) or (4) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member of the
General Assembly and shall serve two-year terms at the pleasure of the
appointing authority.
(d) All initial appointments to the advisory council shall be made not
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 501
later than August 1, 2024. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority. The advisory council shall meet at least monthly.
(e) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee, and a member of the advisory council chosen
by a majority of members of the advisory council, shall serve as
chairpersons. Such chairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of the
advisory council not later than September 1, 2024.
(f) The administrative staff of the [joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services] Office of the Healthcare Advocate shall serve as administrative
staff of the advisory council.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the
advisory council shall submit a report on its findings and
recommendations to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to aging, general law,
human services and insurance, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a.
Sec. 2. Section 42-338 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall timely repair a wheelchair,
including a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair, sold or
leased by such dealer in the state. An authorized wheelchair dealer who
sells or leases a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair in the
state shall provide timely repair of such wheelchair at a consumer's
home upon request.
(b) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall maintain an electronic mail
address and a phone line for consumer repair requests that are
accessible each business day and capable of receiving and recording
messages. The authorized wheelchair dealer shall (1) respond to a
request for wheelchair repair not later than one business day after the
date of request, and (2) order parts for a repair not later than three
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 501
business days after assessing the need for the repair or after receiving
prior authorization from an insurer for the repair.
(c) On and after July 1, 2024, the Office of the Healthcare Advocate,
in consultation with the Department of Consumer Protection, shall
maintain a phone number and electronic mail address to be posted
conspicuously on the Internet web sites of the Office of the Healthcare
Advocate and the department, to receive and record complaints
regarding timely repair issues. Not later than January 1, 2025, and
annually thereafter, the Healthcare Advocate shall submit a report to the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to general law, human services and insurance
regarding the complaints received and recorded pursuant to this
subsection.
(d) Not later than December 31, 2024, and [annually] monthly
thereafter, an authorized wheelchair dealer that contracts with the
Department of Social Services to sell or lease wheelchairs to Medicaid
recipients shall submit a report to the Commissioner of Social Services
and the advisory council established pursuant to section 42-339, as
amended by this act, regarding repair of such wheelchairs. The report
shall include, but need not be limited to, minimum, maximum and
average times from the date and time of a repair request for the
authorized wheelchair dealer to (1) respond; (2) conduct a repair
100 assessment (A) in the home or other community location, (B) remotely,
101 or (C) at a repair facility; (3) request any necessary prior authorization
102 from the Department of Social Services and receive a decision from the
103 department on such request; (4) order any wheelchair parts needed; (5)
104 receive delivery of any needed repair parts; and (6) complete repairs (A)
105 in the home or other community location, (B) remotely, or (C) at a repair
106 facility.
107 (e) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall notify a consumer of such
108 consumer's rights to timely repair, including a repair at the consumer's
109 home upon the consumer's request, and other rights pursuant to this
110 section in writing at the time of purchase or lease by the consumer of a
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 501
111 wheelchair from the authorized wheelchair dealer and on such dealer's
112 Internet web site and any mailings to the consumer. Except for data
113 exempted from disclosure pursuant to section 1-210, an authorized
114 wheelchair dealer shall provide data requested by the council
115 established pursuant to section 42-339, as amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 42-339
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 42-338
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(b)(1), the underlined language was redrafted for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5